Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2325.01
Unlawful interference; penalty.

Any person who willfully and maliciously breaks, injures, destroys, or otherwise interferes with the poles, wires, or other facilities of any telecommunications, broadband, communications, wireless infrastructure, or railroad company or electric light and power company in this state or who willfully and purposely interrupts or interferes with the transmission of telecommunications, broadband, communications, light, heat, or power in this state shall be subject to the action and penalty prescribed in section 28-519.

Laws 1887, c. 87, § 2, p. 634;

R.S.1913, § 7419;

Laws 1915, c. 140, § 1, p. 306;

C.S.1922, § 7098;

C.S.1929, § 86-302;

R.S.1943, § 86-304;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 49;

Laws 1999, LB 496, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-304;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 495;

Laws 2025, LB311, § 16.

Employee of railroad who cuts down telephone wires at crossing is subject to penalty. Alt v. State, 88 Neb. 259, 129 N.W. 432 (1911).